Utah statutes.
34A-2-112.   Administration of this chapter and Chapter 3.

(1)  Administration of this chapter and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, is vested in the commission to be administered through the division, the Division of Adjudication, and for administrative appeals through the commissioner and the Appeals Board.

(2)  The commission:

(a)  has jurisdiction over every workplace in the state and may administer this chapter and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act, and any rule or order issued under these chapters, to ensure that every employee in this state has a safe workplace in which employers have secured the payment of workers' compensation benefits for their employees in accordance with this chapter and Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act;

(b)  through the division under the supervision of the director, has the duty and full authority to take any administrative action authorized under this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational Disease Act; and

(c)  through the Division of Adjudication, commissioner, and Appeals Board, provide for the adjudication and review of an administrative action, decision, or order of the commission in accordance with this title.

